Missouri, session 2026, SB1629.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 319.019, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 319.019,
to read as follows:
319.019. The underground facility owner shall ensure
that all new and active underground facilities installed on
any real property after August 28, [2025] 2026, with the
exception of all storm sewers, regardless of the depth of
installation, and sanitary sewer mains and laterals
installed at depths more than six feet, shall be installed
with a detectible underground location device unless the
facility is capable of being detected from above ground with
an electronic locating device.
✓
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.